test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VLONG_IMPER_boodawe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - VLONG - boodawe - IMPER :

  #Template Key
  #1
  #imperative

     #Isolation form
     boodawe: boodawe
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     boodawe+Imm21: boodawedaa
     boodawe+Imm2Pl: boodaweg
     boodawe+Imm2Sg: boodawen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     boodawe+Del2Pl: boodawekag
     boodawe+Del2Sg: boodawekan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     boodawe+Prob21: boodawesiidaa
     boodawe+Prob2Pl: boodawekegon
     boodawe+Prob2Sg: boodaweken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     boodawe+Imm21+Del2Pl: boodawedaakag
     boodawe+Imm21+Del2Sg: boodawedaakan
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl: boodawegkag
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg: boodawegkan
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl: boodawenkag
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg: boodawenkan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     boodawe+Imm21+Prob21: boodawedaasiidaa
     boodawe+Imm21+Prob2Pl: boodawedaakegon
     boodawe+Imm21+Prob2Sg: boodawedaaken
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Prob21: boodawegsiidaa
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Prob2Pl: boodawegkegon
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Prob2Sg: boodawegken
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Prob21: boodawensiidaa
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Prob2Pl: boodawenkegon
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Prob2Sg: boodawenken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     boodawe+Del2Pl+Prob21: boodawekagsiidaa
     boodawe+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: boodawekagkegon
     boodawe+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: boodawekagken
     boodawe+Del2Sg+Prob21: boodawekansiidaa
     boodawe+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: boodawekankegon
     boodawe+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: boodawekanken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     boodawe+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob21: boodawedaakagsiidaa
     boodawe+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: boodawedaakagkegon
     boodawe+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: boodawedaakagken
     boodawe+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob21: boodawedaakansiidaa
     boodawe+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: boodawedaakankegon
     boodawe+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: boodawedaakanken
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob21: boodawegkagsiidaa
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: boodawegkagkegon
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: boodawegkagken
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob21: boodawegkansiidaa
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: boodawegkankegon
     boodawe+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: boodawegkanken
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob21: boodawenkagsiidaa
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: boodawenkagkegon
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: boodawenkagken
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob21: boodawenkansiidaa
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: boodawenkankegon
     boodawe+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: boodawenkanken
     
